Utah statutes.
53A-8a-401.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes that the quality of public education can be improved and enhanced by systematic, fair, and competent annual evaluation of public educators and remediation of those whose performance is inadequate.

(2)  In accordance with Subsections 53A-1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and (b), the desired purposes of evaluation are to:

(a)  allow the educator and the school district to promote the professional growth of the educator; and

(b)  identify and encourage quality instruction in order to improve student achievement.

